California statutes. Fish and Game Code
All funds in the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Account in excess of the amounts listed above, on June 30 of each fiscal year, shall be used by the department in succeeding fiscal years for projects that preserve California plants, wildlife, and fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 720, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13013.

(a) Appropriations from either the Oil Pollution Administration Subaccount or the Hazardous Materials Administration Subaccount shall not exceed one third of the maximum fund level established under Section 13012 in order to maintain a prudent reserve for future appropriations.

(b) If the director or the director’s designee expends funds from the prudent reserve established pursuant to subdivision (a) for activities authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 13230, the director or the director’s designee shall ensure that there are adequate funds remaining in those subaccounts to carry out their purposes. Expenditures from the prudent reserve shall be repaid in part, or in full, from any funds received pursuant to Section
 13011 until those reserves are fully reimbursed.

(c) The director or the director’s designee, shall recover from the spiller, responsible party, or, in the absence of those responsible parties, from a particular pollution abatement or remediation account, all expenditures paid pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 13230, and all costs incurred by the department arising from the administration and enforcement of applicable pollution laws. The director or the director’s designee may request, and a district attorney, city attorney, or other prosecuting agency, as part of a prosecution or negotiation, may allege a claim for, these costs and expenditures and shall deposit any recoveries into the fund from which they were expended.

(d) The director or the director’s designee shall ensure that there are adequate funds in the accounts and subaccounts specified in this section to
 carry out their purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 223.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13014.

(a) There are hereby established, initially in the Special Deposit Fund, continued in existence by Section 16370 of the Government Code, both of the following accounts:

(1) The Fish and Game Mitigation and Protection Endowment Principal Account. The department shall deposit in this account the endowment funds received by the department pursuant to an agreement described in subdivision (b) and all earnings generated thereon. The earnings shall be available to the department, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, to fund long-term management, enhancement, monitoring, and enforcement activities on habitat lands in a manner consistent with the terms of the underlying agreement.

(2) The Fish and Game Mitigation and Protection Expendable Funds Account. The department shall deposit in this account moneys received pursuant to an agreement described in subdivision (b) that are not endowment funds and that are designated for expenditure for the purposes described in paragraph (2) of that subdivision. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the account established by this paragraph are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes described in this section.

(b) (1) The department may deposit moneys into the accounts established pursuant to
 subdivision (a) that it receives pursuant to any of the following, if those moneys are received for the purposes described in paragraph (2):

(A) Agreements or permits pursuant to the Natural Communities Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3).

(B) Conservation bank agreements.

(C) Habitat conservation implementation agreements.

(D) Incidental take permits.

(E) Legal or other written settlements.

(F) Mitigation agreements.

(G) Streambed or lakebed alteration agreements.

(H) Trust agreements.

(2) The department may deposit the moneys received pursuant to an agreement described in paragraph (1) in an account established by this section only if it receives those moneys for at least one of the following purposes:

(A) Mitigating the adverse biological impacts of a specific project, activity, spill, or release.

(B) Protecting, conserving, restoring, enhancing, managing, and maintaining fish, wildlife, native plants, or their habitats.

(c) While the Fish and Game Mitigation and Protection Endowment Principal Account and the Fish and Game Mitigation and Protection Expendable Funds Account are initially established in the Special Deposit Fund within the Pooled Money
 Investment Account, the Treasurer’s office shall, at the department’s request, transfer these funds from the Pooled Money Investment Account to another account within the State Treasury system to increase earnings over time while providing adequate liquidity. If either or both of these accounts are transferred from the Pooled Money Investment Account, assets in the transferred account or accounts may be held and invested in any of the investments identified in Section 16430 of the Government Code, except that the maturity date of commercial paper may exceed the limits set forth in Section 16430 of the Government Code. These investments shall be made as determined and directed by the department.

(d) To develop and maintain the investment strategy for these accounts, the department may retain investment advisers deemed acceptable to the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 411, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. County [13100. - 13104.]

13100.

(a) The amounts paid to and retained in the county treasury pursuant to Sections 12009 and 13003 shall be deposited in a county fish and wildlife propagation fund and expended for the protection, conservation, propagation, and preservation of fish and wildlife, under the direction of the board of supervisors, pursuant to this chapter.

(b) All proposed expenditures from a county fish and wildlife propagation fund shall be reviewed first at a regular meeting of the county board of supervisors or its designated county fish and game commission to ensure compliance with Section 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 597, Sec. 2.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county may enter into a written agreement with the board of supervisors of one or more counties for the expenditure of any funds deposited in its fish and wildlife propagation fund pursuant to Section 13100 for any purpose authorized by Section 13103 in either, or any, of the counties for the joint benefit of both, or all, of the counties as the judgment of the boards of supervisors may direct. The purchase of real property necessary for that purpose is lawful and title thereto shall be taken in the joint names of each county which contributes funds therefor. The property may be deeded to the state upon the express condition that it shall be employed for the purposes of this chapter within the counties. 

(b) The board of supervisors of one or more counties may enter into a written agreement with the department for the expenditure of any funds deposited in its fish and wildlife propagation fund pursuant to Section 13100 for any purpose authorized by Section 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

Expenditures from the fish and game propagation fund of any county shall be subject to the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 29000) of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

Expenditures from the fish and wildlife propagation fund of any county may be made only for the following purposes:

(a) Public education relating to the scientific principles of fish and wildlife conservation, consisting of supervised formal instruction carried out pursuant to a planned curriculum and aids to education such as literature, audio and video recordings, training models, and nature study facilities.

(b) Temporary emergency treatment and care of injured or orphaned wildlife.

(c) Temporary treatment and care of wildlife confiscated by the department as evidence.

(d) Breeding, raising,
 purchasing, or releasing fish or wildlife
 that are to be released upon approval of the department pursuant to Sections 6400 and 6401 onto land or into waters of local, state, or federal agencies or onto land or into waters open to the public.

(e) Improvement of fish and wildlife habitat, including, but not limited to, construction of fish screens, weirs, and ladders; drainage or other watershed improvements; gravel and rock removal or placement; construction of irrigation and water distribution systems; earthwork and grading; fencing; planting trees and other vegetation management; and removal of barriers to the migration of fish and wildlife.

(f) Construction, maintenance, and operation of public hatchery facilities.

(g) Purchase and maintain materials, supplies, or equipment for either the department’s ownership and
 use or the department’s use in the normal performance of the department’s responsibilities.

(h) Predator control actions for the benefit of fish or wildlife following certification in writing by the department that the proposed actions will significantly benefit a particular wildlife species.

(i) Scientific fish and wildlife research conducted by institutions of higher learning, qualified researchers, or governmental agencies, if approved by the department.

(j) Reasonable administrative costs, excluding the costs of audits required by Section 13104, for secretarial service, travel, and postage by the county fish and wildlife commission when authorized by the county board of supervisors. For purposes of this subdivision, “reasonable cost” means an amount
 that does not exceed 15 percent of the average amount received by the fund during the previous three-year period, or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually, whichever is greater, excluding any funds carried over from a previous fiscal year.

(k) Contributions to a secret witness program for the purpose of facilitating enforcement of this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(l) Costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting civil and criminal actions for violations of this code, as approved by the department.

(m) Costs incurred by a county counsel in investigating and prosecuting an action for civil penalties, injunctive relief, or
 civil penalties and injunctive relief pursuant to Section 5650.1 resulting from unlicensed cannabis cultivation.

(n) Other expenditures, approved by the department, for the purpose of protecting, conserving, propagating, and preserving fish and wildlife.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 10.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

The department may audit, or require the county to audit, expenditures by the county from its fish and wildlife propagation fund in order to determine compliance with this chapter. If, after reviewing the audit, the department determines that expenditures are not in compliance with this chapter, the department may require that all expenditures from the fund be temporarily suspended, or it may seek reimbursement of funds that the department determines, based on the audit, were expended improperly, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 419, Sec. 3.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Accounting [13200. - 13205.]

13200.

The department shall account for revenues and expenditures of the money in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund in a manner consistent with the laws and applicable policies governing state departments generally for each activity or program in which the department is engaged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 114.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

In establishing the appropriate programs or activities for this system, the department shall consider the following programs or activities:

(a) Freshwater fisheries activities.

(b) Marine fisheries activities.

(c) Wildlife management activities.

(d) Planning and environmental review.

(e) Law enforcement.

(f) Nongame and endangered species.

(g) General administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1442, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

Payroll and other costs that are directly identifiable with specific programs or activities shall be charged directly to accounts maintained for the appropriate programs or activities.

Payroll and other costs that are not identifiable with specific programs or activities shall be allocated on an equitable basis to program or activity cost accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1453.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

The basic principle of this cost accounting system shall be that the total cost of operation of the department shall be accounted for by accounting for the cost of each activity or program in which it is engaged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1453.)
-------------------------------------------

13205.

The Augmented Deer Tags Account, Bighorn Sheep Permit Account, and Wild Pig Account, within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, shall be consolidated and any remaining funds in these accounts transferred to the Big Game Management Account, consistent with Section 3953. The department, after consultation with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall provide recommendations to the Legislature for consolidation of additional dedicated accounts within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund if, in the determination of the department, consolidation would serve to reduce administrative costs to the department and enhance its ability to meet current needs, while still preserving the generally stated purpose of the dedicated
 accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 26.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.5. EXPENDITURES [13220. - 13231.]

13220.

Except as provided in Section 13230, the money in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, commencing with the 2005–06 fiscal year, is available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for all of the following purposes:

(a) To the department for payment of refunds of sums determined by it to have been erroneously deposited in the fund, including, but not limited to, money received or collected in payment of fees, licenses, permits, taxes, fines, forfeitures, or services.

(b) To the department for expenditure in accordance with law for the payment of all necessary expenses incurred in carrying out this code and any other laws for
 the protection and preservation of birds, mammals, reptiles, amphibians, and fish.

(c) To the commission for expenditure in accordance with law for the payment of the compensation and expenses of the commissioners and employees of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 115.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13230.

(a) Funds deposited in the Oil Pollution Administration Subaccount created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13010 shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only be expended by the director, his or her deputy, or designee, for the costs of administering the pollution response, abatement, and habitat restoration activities not otherwise authorized by the Lempert-Keene-Seastrand Oil Spill Prevention and Response Act.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited in the Oil Pollution Response and Restoration Subaccount created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13010 are continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure by the director, his or her deputy, or designee, without regard to fiscal years for response and restoration activity related to oil spills not otherwise authorized by the Lempert-Keene-Seastrand Oil Spill Prevention and Response Act.

(c) Funds deposited in the Hazardous Materials Administration Subaccount created pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13010 shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only be expended by the director, his or her deputy, or designee, for the reasonable cost of administering the hazardous materials response and restoration activities of the department.

(1) These activities shall include the cross training and staffing of existing department and interagency personnel necessary to achieve efficiency in the use of existing funds and resources in response to hazardous materials and restoration activities of the department.

(2) The department may appoint and contract with technical experts to assist in the response and remediation of toxic material discharges.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited in the Hazardous Materials Response and Restoration Subaccount are continuously appropriated to the director, his or her deputy, or designee, for expenditure without regard to fiscal years for the response and abatement of hazardous materials that are spilled or discharged on the lands and in the waters of the state, and for the protection, preservation, and restoration of fish and wildlife impacted by discharges of hazardous materials into the environment of the state. No funds appropriated from this subaccount shall be expended to establish personnel positions nor shall any personnel positions be created with contract funds from this subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 720, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13231.

Consistent with Section 13203, the department shall maintain a cost accounting system that accounts for the costs of each activity or program engaged in pursuant to Section 13230 using funds from the subaccounts listed in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. PACIFIC MARINE FISHERIES COMPACT [14000. - 14105.]



CHAPTER 1. The Compact [14000. - 14002.]

14000.

The Governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any or all of the States of Alaska, Idaho, Oregon and Washington for the purpose of cooperating with those states in the formation of a Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

The form and contents of the Pacific Marine Fisheries Compact shall be substantially as provided in this section and the effect of its provisions shall be interpreted and administered in conformity with the provisions of this division: 
Pacific Marine Fisheries Compact
The contracting states do hereby agree as follows: 
Article I
The purposes of this compact are and shall be to promote the better utilization of fisheries, marine, shell and anadromous, which are of mutual concern, and to develop a joint program of protection and prevention of physical waste of such fisheries in all of those areas of the Pacific Ocean over which the compacting states jointly or separately now have or may hereafter acquire jurisdiction.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed so as to authorize the compacting states or any of them to limit the production of fish or fish products for the purpose of establishing or fixing the prices thereof or creating and perpetuating a monopoly. 
Article II
This agreement shall
 become operative immediately as to those states executing it in the form that is in accordance with the laws of the executing state and when the Congress has given its consent. 
Article III
Each state joining herein shall appoint, as determined by state statutes, one or more representatives to a commission hereby constituted and designated as the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission, of whom one shall be the administrative or other officer of the agency of such state charged with the conservation of the fisheries resources to which this compact pertains. This commission shall be invested with the powers and duties set forth herein.

The term of each commissioner of the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission shall be four years. A commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and
 qualified but such successor’s term shall expire four years from legal date of expiration of the term of his predecessor. Vacancies occurring in the office of such commissioner from any reason or cause shall be filled for the unexpired term, or a commissioner may be removed from office, as provided by the statutes of the state concerned. Each commissioner may delegate in writing from time to time, to a deputy, the power to be present and participate, including voting as his representative or substitute, at any meeting of or hearing by or other proceeding of the commission.

Voting powers under this compact shall be limited to one vote for each state regardless of the number of representatives. 
Article IV
The duty of the said commission shall be to make inquiry and ascertain from time to time such methods, practices,
 circumstances and conditions as may be disclosed for bringing about the conservation and the prevention of the depletion and physical waste of the fisheries, marine, shell, and anadromous in all of those areas of the Pacific Ocean over which the states signatory to this compact jointly or separately now have or may hereafter acquire jurisdiction. The commission shall have power to recommend the coordination of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their respective jurisdictions and said conservation zones to promote the preservation of those fisheries and their protection against overfishing, waste, depletion or any abuse whatsoever and to assure a continuing yield from the fisheries resources of the signatory parties hereto.

To that end the commission shall draft and, after consultation with the advisory committee hereinafter authorized, recommend to the governors and legislative branches of the various signatory states hereto legislation
 dealing with the conservation of the marine, shell, and anadromous fisheries in all of those areas of the Pacific Ocean over which the states signatory to this compact jointly or separately now have or may hereafter acquire jurisdiction. The commission shall, more than one month prior to any regular meeting of the legislative branch in any state signatory hereto, present to the governor of such state its recommendations relating to enactments by the legislative branch of that state in furthering the intents and purposes of this compact.

The commission shall consult with and advise the pertinent administrative agencies in the signatory states with regard to problems connected with the fisheries and recommend the adoption of such regulations as it deems advisable and which lie within the jurisdiction of such agencies.

The commission shall have power to recommend to the states signatory hereto the stocking of the waters of
 such states with marine, shell or anadromous fish and fish eggs or joint stocking by some or all of such states and when two or more of the said states shall jointly stock waters the commission shall act as the coordinating agency for such stocking. 
Article V
The commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice chairman and shall appoint and at its pleasure remove or discharge such officers and employees as may be required to carry the provisions of this compact into effect and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation. Said commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business. It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time or place within the territorial limits of the signatory states but must meet at least once a year. 
Article VI
No action shall be taken by the commission except by the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states represented at any meeting. No recommendation shall be made by the commission in regard to any species of fish except by the vote of a majority of the compacting states which have an interest in such species. 
Article VII
The fisheries research agencies of the signatory states shall act in collaboration as the official research agency of the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission.

An advisory committee to be representative of the commercial fishermen, commercial fishing industry and such other interests of each state as the commission
 deems advisable shall be established by the commission as soon as practicable for the purpose of advising the commission upon such recommendations as it may desire to make. 
Article VIII
Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the powers of any state or to repeal or prevent the enactment of any legislation or the enforcement of any requirement by any state imposing additional conditions and restrictions to conserve its fisheries. 
Article IX
Continued absence of representation or of any representative on the commission from any state party hereto, shall be brought to the attention of the governor thereof. 
Article X
The states agree to make available annual funds for the support of the commission on the following basis:

Eighty percent of the annual budget shall be shared equally by those member states having as a boundary the Pacific Ocean. Not less than 5 percent of the annual budget shall be contributed by any other member state. The balance of the annual budget shall be shared by those member states having as a boundary the Pacific Ocean, in proportion to the primary market value of the products of their commercial fisheries on the basis of the latest five-year catch records.

The annual contribution of each member state shall be figured to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). 
Article XI
This compact shall
 continue in force and remain binding upon each state until renounced by it. Renunciation of this compact must be preceded by sending six months’ notice in writing of intention to withdraw from the compact to the other parties hereto. 
Article XII
Hawaii or any other state having rivers or streams tributary to the Pacific Ocean may become a contracting state by enactment of the Pacific Marine Fisheries Compact. Upon admission of any new state to the compact, the purposes of the compact and the duties of the commission shall extend to the development of joint programs for the conservation, protection and prevention of physical waste of fisheries in which the contracting states are mutually concerned and to all waters of the newly admitted state necessary to develop such programs.

This compact shall become effective upon
 its enactment by the states signatory to this compact and upon ratification by Congress by virtue of the authority vested in it under Article 1, Section 10, of the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

Participation by this State in this compact shall continue until the Legislature otherwise provides by law. Notice of intention to withdraw from such compact shall be executed and transmitted by the Governor after the Legislature provides by law for discontinuance of participation therein by this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The Commission [14100. - 14105.]

14100.

In furtherance of the provisions contained in the compact there shall be three members of the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission from the State of California, appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. One such commissioner shall be the administrative or other officer of the department or agency of this state charged with the conservation of its marine fisheries resources; another commissioner shall be a Member of the Legislature of this state who is a member of a committee on interstate cooperation of the said Legislature, and another member shall be a citizen of this state who shall have wide knowledge of and interest in the marine fisheries problem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.

The term of each commissioner shall be four years. A commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and qualified but such successor’s term shall expire four years from the legal date of expiration of the term of his predecessor. Any commissioner may be removed from office by the Governor upon charges and after a hearing. The term of any commissioner who ceases to hold the qualifications required shall terminate when a successor may be duly appointed. Vacancies occurring in the office of a commissioner from any reason or cause shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as for a full term appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.

Each commissioner who is not also a state officer shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day performing official duties pursuant to the direction of the commission, and each commissioner shall receive actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in performing official duties on behalf of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 116.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

All officers of the State are authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. The policy of this State is to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish the purposes thereof. All officers, bureaus, departments and persons of and in the State Government or administration of the State are hereby authorized and directed at convenient times and upon request of the commission to furnish the commission with information and data possessed by them and to aid the commission by any means lying within their legal rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of its activities and shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before the thirty-first day of December in each year, setting forth in detail the transactions conducted by it during that calendar year and shall make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by it advisable, including amendments to the statutes which may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of the compact between the signatory states.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.

When the Governor on behalf of the State executes the compact, he shall attach his signature thereto under a recital that such compact is executed pursuant to the provisions thereof, subject to the limitations and qualifications contained in the sections of this division in aid and furtherance thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. AQUACULTURE [15000. - 15703.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [15000. - 15008.]

15000.

(a) The business of aquaculture is governed by this division and is exempt from Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 6 and any other provision of this code relating to commercial fishing, harvesting, processing, and marketing.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 15005, 15200, 15201, and 15202, the business of aquaculture processing, distribution, and marketing is administered by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(c) The director may enter into an agreement with the Secretary of Food and Agriculture for the resolution of any conflict that arises under subdivision (b).

(d) Any costs incurred by the department in implementing Sections 15005, 15200, 15201, and 15202 shall be recovered pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

The cultured progeny of wild plants and animals lawfully obtained under Section 15300 are the exclusive property of that person who cultured them or that person’s successor in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15002.

Any person who takes aquaculture products without lawful entitlement is subject to prosecution for theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15003.

(a) The department may assess a fee on persons growing aquaculture products on public lands and in public waters based on the price per pound of the products sold. The fees, if imposed, shall be set at amounts necessary to defray the costs of the commission and the department in administering this division. However, the fees, if any, may not exceed the rates as provided in Section 8051.

(b) The price per pound shall be based on the whole product weight or its equivalent as taken by the lessee.

(c) The fee imposed by this section shall be paid monthly to the department within 30 days after the close of each month. If not paid within 60 days after the close of the month in which it is due, a 10 percent penalty shall be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 37.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15004.

Aquaculturists operating under this division shall pay all costs incurred by the department when conducting any inspections of plants, animals, facilities, or culture areas required by this division, or by regulations adopted pursuant to this division, when requested by the aquaculturists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   (SB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15005.

(a) When necessary for the protection of native wildlife, the commission may regulate the transportation, purchase, possession, and sale of specific aquaculture products as provided for in this section.

(b) The commission may determine that aquaculture products shall be accompanied by a document containing any of the following information:

(1) The name, address, and registration number of the aquaculture producer.

(2) The species.

(3) The weight, volume or count within the container.

(4) The date of the shipment.

(5) The name and address of the intended receiver.

(c) The commission may require that certain aquaculture products shall be additionally identified as being aquaculture produced, except for the following:

(1) Trout.

(2) Catfish.

(3) Kelp and aquatic plants.

(4) Frogs and amphibia.

(5) All bivalve mollusks (except little neck clams).

(6) All members of the family Centrarchidae.

(7) Crayfish.

(8) Sea urchins.

(9) Shrimp and fresh water prawns.

(10) Crab.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

15006.

Nothing in this division applies to authorized species of ornamental marine or freshwater plants and animals not utilized for human consumption or bait purposes that are maintained in closed systems for personal, pet industry, or hobby purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 20.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

15007.

(a) In the waters of the Pacific Ocean that are regulated by this state, it is unlawful to spawn, incubate, or cultivate any species of finfish belonging to the family Salmonidae, transgenic fish species, or any exotic species of finfish. Except as authorized pursuant to subdivision (d), it is unlawful to spawn, incubate, or cultivate any transgenic species of finfish belonging to the family Salmonidae in this state. This section does not apply to salmon or steelhead trout reared from native California stocks that are propagated and cultured for either of the following:

(1) Research conducted by, or on behalf of, the department.

(2) Release into ocean waters for the purpose of recovery, restoration, or enhancement of California’s native salmon and steelhead trout populations pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 6900) of Part 1 of Division 6.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes artificial propagation, rearing, or stocking of transgenic freshwater and marine fishes, invertebrates, crustaceans, or mollusks.

(c) Research or experimentation for the commercial production of transgenic salmonids is prohibited.

(d) (1) Medical or scientific research conducted on transgenic finfish species by accredited California academic institutions or private entities for research only and not for commercial production may be authorized pursuant to a permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 671 of Title
 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on May 14, 2003.

(2) At a minimum, research activities conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be conducted in a closed system that has eliminated the risk of escape of transgenic finfish species and any potential disease they may transmit.

(3) A permit application applied for pursuant to this subdivision shall include a research plan specifying the objectives and goals of the proposed research.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the disclosure of proprietary information.

(e) The department shall notify the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture and the commission upon receipt of a permit application applied for pursuant to subdivision (d) at least 30
 days prior to the approval or disapproval of the permit.

(f) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Exotic species” means a fish that is not native to California waters and that does not currently exist as a viable population in a wild condition in the state.

(2) “Transgenic” has the same meaning as in Section 1.92 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on May 14, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 444, Sec. 3.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15007.5.

(a) It shall be unlawful to engage in the aquaculture of any species of octopus for the purpose of human consumption.

(b) A business owner or operator shall not sell, possess, or transport any species of octopus that is the result
 or product of
 aquaculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.   (AB 3162)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15008.

(a) The department shall, in consultation with the Aquaculture Development Committee, prepare programmatic environmental impact reports for existing and potential commercial aquaculture operations in both coastal and inland areas of the state if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Funds are appropriated to the department for this purpose.
